Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF670.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; EVIDENCE-BASED EMPLOYMENT SUPPORT SERVICES TO PERSONS WITH MENTAL ILLNESS.new text end new text begin $2,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $2,500,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for grants to programs that provide evidence-based employment support services to persons with mental illness under Minnesota Statutes, sections 268A.13 and 268A.14. This appropriation is added to the base and must be used to sustain current programs and expand programs to areas of the state without an existing evidence-based employment support program and to expand existing programs, including programs that do not currently receive state funding. new text end